Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1137
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds and declares that there is a need to establish a process and criteria to assess, identify, and verify children who may require special education. Research-based criteria and a rational process for the assessment of children who may require special education will lead to greater equity, consistency, and efficiency in the identification of and the provision of services to such children. It is the intent of the Legislature that all children who require special education services shall be identified and verified pursuant to such criteria and process.

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-605;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3316;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 819;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 27.